testing/myv-tests.yaml
  Verb - марямс: # Verb1
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill: марямс
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px1Sg: марямозон
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px2Sg: марямозот
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px3Sg: марямозонзо
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px1Pl: марямозонок
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px2Pl: марямозонк
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Px3Pl: марямозост
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc: марямо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px1Sg: марямон
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px2Sg: марямот
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px3Sg: марямонзо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px1Pl: марямонок
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px2Pl: марямонк
     марямс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Loc+Px3Pl: марямост
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl: марямодо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px1Sg: марямодон
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px2Sg: марямодот
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px3Sg: марямодонзо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px1Pl: марямодонок
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px2Pl: марямодонк
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+DV+Abl+Px3Pl: марямодост
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl: марямга
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px1Sg: марямган
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px2Sg: марямгат
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px3Sg: марямганзо
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px1Pl: марямганок
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px2Pl: марямганк
     марямс+V+Der/Омга+Inf+Prl+Px3Pl: марямгаст
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela: марямсто
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px1Sg: марямстон
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px2Sg: марямстот
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px3Sg: марямстонзо
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px1Pl: марямстонок
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px2Pl: марямстонк
     марямс+V+Der/ОмстО+Inf+Ela+Px3Pl: марямстост
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Sg: марямсан
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Sg: марямсат
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Sg: марямс
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl: марямстано
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Pl: марямстадо
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Sg: марямсолинь
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Sg: марямсолить
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Sg: марямсоль
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl: марямсолинек
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Pl: марямсолиде
     марямс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Pred+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl: марямсольть
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Sg: маряман
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Sg: марямат
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Sg: маряма
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl: маряматано
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Pl: маряматадо
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl: марямат
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Sg: марямалинь
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Sg: марямалить
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2: марямаль
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl: марямалинек
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Pl: марямалиде
     марямс+V+Der/Ома+Obligatory+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl: марямальть
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State: марязь
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Sg: марязян
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Sg: марязят
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl: марязтяно
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Pl: марязтядо
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl: марязть
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Sg: марязелинь
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Sg: марязелить
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Sg: марязель
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl: марязелинек
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Pl: марязелиде
     марямс+V+Der/Озь+Ger+State+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl: марязельть
     марямс+V+Der/Онь+Gen: марянь
     марямс+V+Der/Овт+TelicN: марявт
     марямс+V+Der/ОмА+VN: марямо
     марямс+V+Der/Ы+Ptc: мари
     марямс+V+Der/Ы+Ptc+Der/кс: марикс
     марямс+V+Der/Ый+Ptc: марий
     марямс+V+Der/Ыця+Ptc+Restrict: мариця
     марямс+V+ConNeg: маря
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Sg: маряк
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Sg+Oc3Sg: марик
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Sg+Oc1Sg: марямак
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Sg+Oc3Pl: марить
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Pl: марядо
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Pl+Oc3Sg: маринк
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Pl+Oc3Pl: маринк
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Sg+Oc1Pl: марямизь
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Pl+Oc1Sg: марямизь
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc2Pl+Oc1Pl: марямизь
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc3Sg+Oc1Pl: марямизь
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc3Pl+Oc1Sg: марямизь
     марямс+V+Imprt+Sc3Pl+Oc1Pl: марямизь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Sg: марязан
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc2Sg: марязат
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Sg: марязо
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Pl: марязтано
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc2Pl: марязтадо
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Pl: марязт
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Sg+Oc3Sg: марязса
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc2Sg+Oc3Sg: марязсак
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Sg+Oc3Sg: марязсо
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Sg+Oc3Pl: марязсынь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc2Sg+Oc3Pl: марязсыть
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Sg+Oc3Pl: марязсынзе
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Pl+Oc3Sg: марязсынек
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Pl+Oc3Pl: марязсынек
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc2Pl+Oc3Sg: марязсынк
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc2Pl+Oc3Pl: марязсынк
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Pl+Oc3Sg: марязсызь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Pl+Oc3Pl: марязсызь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Sg+Oc2Sg: маряздан
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Sg+Oc2Sg: марянзат
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: марязтадызь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: марязтадызь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: марязтадызь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: марязтадызь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: марязтадызь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: марязтадызь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc2Sg+Oc1Sg: марязмак
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Sg+Oc1Sg: марязмам
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: марязмизь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: марязмизь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: марязмизь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: марязмизь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: марязмизь
     марямс+V+Opt+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: марязмизь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Sg: марян
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Sg: марят
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Sg: мари
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl: марятано
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Pl: марятадо
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl: марить
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Sg+Oc3Sg: маряса
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Sg+Oc3Sg: марясак
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Sg+Oc3Sg: марясы
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Sg+Oc3Pl: марясынь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Sg+Oc3Pl: марясыть
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Sg+Oc3Pl: марясынзе
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl+Oc3Sg: марясынек
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl+Oc3Pl: марясынек
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Pl+Oc3Sg: марясынк
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Pl+Oc3Pl: марясынк
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl+Oc3Sg: марясызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl+Oc3Pl: марясызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Sg+Oc2Sg: марятан
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Sg+Oc2Sg: марятанзат
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: марятадызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: марятадызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: марятадызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: марятадызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: марятадызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: марятадызь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc2Sg+Oc1Sg: марясамак
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Sg+Oc1Sg: марясамам
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: марясамизь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: марясамизь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: марясамизь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: марясамизь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: марясамизь
     марямс+V+Ind+NonPast+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: марясамизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Sg: маринь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc2Sg: марить
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Sg: марясь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Pl: маринек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc2Pl: мариде
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Pl: марясть
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Sg+Oc3Sg: мария
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc2Sg+Oc3Sg: марик
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Sg+Oc3Sg: маризе
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Sg+Oc3Pl: маринь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc2Sg+Oc3Pl: марить
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Sg+Oc3Pl: маринзе
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Pl+Oc3Sg: маринек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Pl+Oc3Pl: маринек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc2Pl+Oc3Sg: маринк
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc2Pl+Oc3Pl: маринк
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Pl+Oc3Sg: маризь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Pl+Oc3Pl: маризь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Sg+Oc2Sg: маритинь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Sg+Oc2Sg: маринзеть
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: маридизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: маридизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: маридизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: маридизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: маридизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: маридизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc2Sg+Oc1Sg: маримик
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Sg+Oc1Sg: маримим
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: маримизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: маримизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: маримизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: маримизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: маримизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: маримизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Sg: марилинь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Sg: марилить
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Sg: мариль
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl: марилинек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Pl: марилиде
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl: марильть
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Sg+Oc3Sg: марилия
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Sg+Oc3Sg: марилик
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Sg+Oc3Sg: марилизе
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Sg+Oc3Pl: марилинь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Sg+Oc3Pl: марилить
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Sg+Oc3Pl: марилинзе
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl+Oc3Sg: марилинек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl+Oc3Pl: марилинек
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Pl+Oc3Sg: марилинк
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Pl+Oc3Pl: марилинк
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl+Oc3Sg: марилизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl+Oc3Pl: марилизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Sg+Oc2Sg: марилитинь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Sg+Oc2Sg: марилинзеть
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: марилидизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: марилидизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: марилидизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: марилидизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: марилидизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: марилидизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc2Sg+Oc1Sg: марилимик
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Sg+Oc1Sg: марилимим
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: марилимизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: марилимизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: марилимизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: марилимизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: марилимизь
     марямс+V+Ind+Prt2+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: марилимизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Sg: марявлинь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc2Sg: марявлить
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Sg: маряволь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Pl: марявлинек
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc2Pl: марявлиде
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Pl: марявольть
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Sg+Oc3Sg: марявлия
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc2Sg+Oc3Sg: марявлик
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Sg+Oc3Sg: марявлизе
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Sg+Oc3Pl: марявлинь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc2Sg+Oc3Pl: марявлить
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Sg+Oc3Pl: марявлинзе
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Pl+Oc3Sg: марявлинек
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Pl+Oc3Pl: марявлинек
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc2Pl+Oc3Sg: марявлинк
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc2Pl+Oc3Pl: марявлинк
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Pl+Oc3Sg: марявлизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Pl+Oc3Pl: марявлизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Sg+Oc2Sg: марявлитинь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Sg+Oc2Sg: марявлинзеть
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: марявлидизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: марявлидизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: марявлидизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: марявлидизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: марявлидизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: марявлидизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc2Sg+Oc1Sg: марявлимик
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Sg+Oc1Sg: марявлимим
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Sg+Oc2Pl: марявлимизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Pl+Oc2Sg: марявлимизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc1Pl+Oc2Pl: марявлимизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Sg+Oc2Pl: марявлимизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Pl+Oc2Sg: марявлимизь
     марямс+V+Conj+Sc3Pl+Oc2Pl: марявлимизь
     марямс+V+Des+Prt2+Sc1Sg: мариксэлинь
